Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 24.5
AQUACULTURE

Section

35-24.5-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Aquaculture Act".

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 189, § 1, effective June 7.

35-24.5-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that it is in the interest of the people of the state that the practice of aquaculture be encouraged in order to promote agricultural diversification, augment food supplies, expand employment opportunities, promote economic activity, increase stocks of fish and other aquatic life, protect and better use and manage the land and water resources of the state, and provide other benefits to the state.

The general assembly further finds and declares that aquaculture shall be considered an agricultural enterprise as defined in the "Colorado Agricultural Development Authority Act", article 75 of this title, and, for property tax assessment purposes, shall be classified pursuant to section 39-1-102 (1.6)(b), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 189, § 1, effective June 7.

35-24.5-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Aquaculture" means the controlled propagation, growth, and harvest of, and subsequent commerce in, cultured aquatic stock, including but not limited to fish and other aquatic vertebrates, mollusks, crustaceans, and algae and other aquatic plants, by an aquaculturist.

"Aquaculture facility" means any facility, structure, lake, pond, tank, or tanker truck used for the purpose of propagating, selling, brokering, trading, or transporting live fish or viable gametes.

"Aquaculturist" means an individual, partnership, or corporation, other than an employee of a state or federal hatchery, involved in producing, transporting, or marketing cultured aquatic stock or products thereof.

"Aquatic disease" means any departure from a normal state of health of aquatic organisms caused by disease agents.

"Aquatic organism" means an individual member of any species of fish, mollusk, crustacean, aquatic reptile, aquatic amphibian, or aquatic insect or other aquatic invertebrate. "Aquatic organism" includes the viable gametes (eggs or sperm) of an aquatic organism.

"Board" means the aquaculture board.

"Commercial aquaculturist" means an aquaculturist engaged in the business of growing, selling, brokering, or processing live or viable aquatic organisms for commercial purposes.

"Commission" means the state agricultural commission.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture.

"Cultured aquatic stock" means aquatic organisms raised from privately owned stocks and aquatic organisms lawfully acquired and held in private ownership until they become intermingled with wild aquatic organisms; except that "cultured aquatic stock" does not include state-owned fish, crustaceans, amphibians, or mollusks lawfully taken and used or sold for bait only.

"Department" means the department of agriculture.

"Division" means the division of parks and wildlife in the department of natural resources.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 190, § 1, effective June 7.

35-24.5-104. Aquaculture board.

There is hereby created and established in the department an aquaculture board, which shall consist of the following:

The five persons who make up the fish health board as established in section 33-5.5-101, C.R.S.; and

Two additional members, to be appointed by the commissioner, who are familiar with the commercial marketing or processing of aquatic organisms and their products or with the financing of commercial aquaculture.

The term of office of the two additional members shall be three years. Each of these members shall serve until his or her successor has been appointed and qualified, and either member shall be eligible for reappointment. They shall serve without compensation except for actual and necessary traveling expenses.

The board shall annually select a chairman and a vice-chairman, who may be the same as the chairman and vice-chairman of the fish health board.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum, and, if a quorum is present, in person or by telephone, the board may act upon a vote of a majority of those present.

The board shall constitute a "public entity" and each member and employee of the board shall constitute a "public employee" within the meaning of the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.

The board is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercises its powers and performs its duties and functions specified in this article 24.5 under the department and the executive director thereof.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 191, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 2022:

(6) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3402, § 147, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

35-24.5-105. Duties of the board.

The board shall consider, initiate, and recommend rules, not inconsistent with law, to the commissioner concerning the regulation of the aquaculture industry and its markets, except for rules that regulate, control, or otherwise relate to fish health, to the spread of aquatic disease, or to the importation into the state or the distribution and management of any exotic aquatic species, all of which subjects are within the jurisdiction of the parks and wildlife commission.

The board shall develop appropriate programs to assist in the protection, growth, and promotion of the aquaculture industry of the state and shall recommend policies and procedures to the commissioner and the commission for the accomplishment of such a plan.

The board shall review any suspensions or revocations of aquaculture facility permits and any orders for the destruction of aquatic organisms or for quarantine of aquaculture facilities which last beyond thirty days, and all such suspensions, revocations, and orders shall be conditioned upon the board's approval; except that destruction orders may be approved by the commissioner upon a determination that a situation exists which threatens imminent danger to existing aquatic populations or to human health and safety and that no more reasonable means exist to control the situation. Destruction of aquatic organisms or quarantines shall be done in accordance with applicable regulations of the department.

The board shall review aquaculture facility permitting procedures and shall make recommendations to the department concerning such procedures and any related fees and charges.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 191, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1236, § 94, effective June 4.

35-24.5-106. Rules.

To carry out the provisions of this article, the board is authorized to consider and recommend to the commissioner appropriate rules to be promulgated pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S., including but not limited to rules concerning the following:

Fees to fund all direct and indirect costs of the administration and enforcement of this article;

Standards applicable to products of cultured aquatic stock offered for sale; and

The establishment of standards for and certification of private aquaculture facilities, which may include standards for commercial aquaculturists.

Nothing in this section diminishes or supersedes the authority of the division or the parks and wildlife commission to regulate or manage wild populations of aquatic organisms in the waters of the state or in facilities controlled or managed by the division or by the United States fish and wildlife service.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 192, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1236, § 95, effective June 4.

35-24.5-107. Powers and duties of the commissioner.

To carry out the provisions of this article, the commissioner is authorized to adopt appropriate rules pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S., including but not limited to rules concerning the following:

Fees to fund all direct and indirect costs of the administration and enforcement of this article and article 5.5 of title 33, C.R.S.;

Standards applicable to products of cultured aquatic stock offered for sale; and

The establishment of standards for and certification of private aquaculture facilities, which may include standards for commercial aquaculturists.

Nothing in this section diminishes or supersedes the authority of the division or the parks and wildlife commission to regulate or manage wild populations of aquatic organisms in the waters of the state or in facilities controlled or managed by the division or by the United States fish and wildlife service.

The commissioner shall institute appropriate programs to assist in the protection, growth, and promotion of the aquaculture industry in the state.

The commissioner shall provide facilities and support to the board for use in carrying out its duties.

The commissioner shall provide for the issuance of permits for aquaculture facilities and shall establish permit fees to offset the costs of regulating the aquaculture industry.

The commissioner shall enforce all rules and regulations concerning aquaculture except those which relate to fish health, or to the spread of aquatic diseases, or to the importation into the state or the distribution and management of any exotic aquatic species, all of which rules and regulations shall be enforced by the division.

The commissioner may contract for the services of any certified aquatic disease laboratory or certified aquatic disease specialist in this state or in any other state, or with any other government agency, through intergovernmental agreement, contract, or memorandum of understanding to implement and enforce the rules and regulations of the commissioner.

The commissioner may quarantine aquaculture facilities subject to the review of the aquaculture board pursuant to section 35-24.5-105 (3).

Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with or to supersede the authority of the Colorado department of public health and environment to regulate the growing, harvesting, and shipping of molluskan shellfish or any other processed fish or seafood products intended for human consumption.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 193, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 94:

(9) amended, p. 2804, § 574, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1236, § 96, effective June 4.

35-24.5-108. Delegation of duties - cooperative agreements.

The powers and duties vested in the commissioner by this article may be delegated to qualified employees of the department.

After thorough consultation with the board, the department may receive and expend grants-in-aid from any agency of the United States and may cooperate and enter into agreements with any agency of the United States, any agency of any other state, and any agency of this state or its political subdivisions for the purposes of this article.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 194, § 1, effective June 7.

35-24.5-109. Facility permit required.

On or after January 1, 1992, no person shall operate a fish production facility for the purpose of propagating, selling, trading, or transporting live fish or viable gametes unless such fish production facility possesses a valid and current aquaculture facility permit issued by the commissioner.

One or more satellite stations of a fish production facility may operate under one aquaculture facility permit if all such satellite stations are listed on such facility permit.

Each person seeking to obtain an aquaculture facility permit shall make application to the commissioner on forms prescribed and furnished by the commissioner.

An annual facility permit fee in an amount to be established by the commissioner, not to exceed one hundred eighty dollars, shall accompany the application.

No aquaculture facility permit shall be required for persons to obtain and possess live fish for aquaria or private ponds so long as such aquaria or ponds are hydrologically closed systems and are not connected to state waters and so long as live fish which have been held in such aquaria or ponds are not released into state waters.

No aquaculture facility permit shall be required of any federal, state, or county agency or of any person possessing a valid scientific collecting permit who is conducting research or educational activities with lawfully acquired fish, nor shall such permit be required of any zoo accredited by the American association of zoological parks and aquariums; except that such persons and entities must adhere to all other division of parks and wildlife regulations including record-keeping and importation requirements.

Any person who operates or uses an aquaculture facility, whether as owner, operator, lessee, or pursuant to any contract, or who otherwise buys, sells, trades, or acts as a broker of live fish or viable gametes, shall be subject to all applicable regulations including record-keeping and importation requirements.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 194, § 1, effective June 7.

35-24.5-110. Civil penalties - disciplinary actions.

Any person that violates any of the provisions of this article or any rule or regulation promulgated by the commission pursuant to this article may be punished upon a finding of such violation by the commissioner as follows:

In any first administrative proceeding, a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars;

In any subsequent administrative proceeding against the same person, a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand dollars.

If the commissioner is unable to collect such civil penalty or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the commissioner, the commissioner may bring suit to recover such amount plus costs and attorney fees by action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

In addition to the penalties provided in subsection (1) of this section, the commissioner may withhold, deny, suspend, or revoke the aquaculture facility permit of any aquaculturist if the commissioner finds that such person has committed any of the following:

Fraud or material deception in the obtaining or renewal of a permit;

Failure to comply with any provision of this article or rules promulgated by the commissioner or any lawful order of the commissioner pursuant thereto;

Failure to comply with any provision of section 33-6-114.5 (1) to (6), C.R.S., or with any rule or regulation of the division, or with any statutory provision relating to fish health, the spread of aquatic diseases, or the importation into the state, distribution, or management of any exotic aquatic species;

Contracting with or assisting unlicensed persons to perform services or operate in a manner for which a license is required under this article.

Any revocation or suspension of a permit by the commissioner shall be subject to review by the board pursuant to section 35-24.5-105 (3); except that the commissioner may issue an order to cease and desist from doing any act which is determined to present an immediate danger to other aquatic stock pending such review by the board. For the purpose of enforcing any such cease-and-desist order, the commissioner has, in addition to any other powers conferred by statute, the power to exercise such physical control over property and persons as may be necessary to protect the health of such aquatic stock or of the public.

Whenever the commissioner possesses sufficient evidence satisfactory to the commissioner indicating that any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this article or of any rule adopted under this article, the commissioner may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction to temporarily or permanently restrain or enjoin the act or practice in question and to enforce compliance with this article or any rule or order under this article. In any such action, the commissioner shall not be required to plead or prove irreparable injury or the inadequacy of the remedy at law. Under no circumstances shall the court require the commissioner to post a bond.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 195, § 1, effective June 7.

35-24.5-111. Aquaculture fund created.

All fees and penalties collected pursuant to this article shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the aquaculture cash fund, which fund is hereby created. The moneys in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the department for the direct and indirect costs of the administration of this article.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 196, § 1, effective June 7.